Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-624
Highway, defined.

Highway shall mean the entire width between the boundary limits of any street, road, avenue, boulevard, or way which is publicly maintained when any part thereof is open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 120.

A hospital driveway which is privately maintained and subject to use by patients, visitors, and others having legitimate business at the hospital is not a "highway," within the meaning of this section and, therefore, the rules of the road as set forth in sections 39-601 to 39-6,122 do not apply to its use. However, common law applicable to users of public ways does apply. Bassinger v. Agnew, 206 Neb. 1, 290 N.W.2d 793 (1980) (sections 39-601 to 39-6,122 were transferred to Chapter 60, article 6).

Where highway includes two roadways thirty feet apart, each crossing thereof is a separate intersection. Therkildsen v. Gottsch, 194 Neb. 729, 235 N.W.2d 622 (1975).